Washington statutes.
RCW 2.70.005

Office of public defense established.

In order to implement the constitutional and statutory guarantees of counsel and to ensure effective and efficient delivery of indigent defense services funded by the state of Washington, an office of public defense is established as an independent agency of the judicial branch.

[ 2008 c 313 s 2; 1996 c 221 s 1.]

NOTES:

Findings—2008 c 313: "(1) The legislature finds that the office of public defense:

(a) Operates in an efficient and economical manner, with adequate cost controls in place;

(b) Meets established goals and targets; and

(c) Does not substantially duplicate services offered by other agencies or the private sector.

(2) Termination of the office of public defense would have substantial and wide-reaching ramifications on the court system in Washington state. The right to counsel is a constitutional right, and provision of counsel for indigent defendants is a government responsibility." [ 2008 c 313 s 1.]